Utah statutes.
77-28b-4.   Role of the classification officer.

(1)  The classification officer of each correctional institution shall be provided with the eligibility requirements of each prisoner transfer treaty.

(2)  The classification officer shall forward Form I, Transfer Inquiry, to all offenders identified as having national or citizenship status in a party nation.

(3)  Upon receipt of Form I, Transfer Inquiry, the offender may indicate he is:

(a)  interested in pursuing a transfer by signing Form I and returning it to the classification officer along with proof of citizenship; or

(b)  not interested in pursuing a transfer by returning Form I to the classification officer without proof of citizenship.

(4)  If the offender indicates on Form I, Transfer Inquiry, that he is interested in pursuing a transfer, the institution classification officer shall complete Form II, Inmate Information Provided to Treaty Nation, and Form III, Notice Regarding International Prisoner Transfer.

(5)  The following forms, provided by the federal government, shall be completed and forwarded in triplicate by the classification officer to the superintendent of the institution:

(a)  Form I, Transfer Inquiry;

(b)  Form II, Inmate Information Provided to Treaty Nation;

(c)  Form III, Notice Regarding International Prisoner Transfer;

(d)  proof of citizenship;

(e)  statement of offender's eligibility;

(f)  presentence report;

(g)  classification assessment;

(h)  current psychological and medical reports;

(i)  signed release of confidential information forms;

(j)  criminal history sheet; and

(k)  judgments of conviction or certification to be tried as an adult.

